North Dakota, session 69, HB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 47-16-07.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
47-16-07.1. Real property and dwelling security deposits - Limitations and
requirements.
1. The lessor of real property or a dwelling who requires money as a security deposit,
however denominated, shall deposit the money in a federally insured interest-bearing
savings or checking account for the benefit of the tenant. The security deposit and any
interest accruing on the deposit must be paid to the lessee upon termination of a
lease, subject to the conditions of subsection 2. A lessor may not demand or receive
security, however denominated, in an amount or value in excess of one month's rent,
except:
a. A lessor may accept an amount or value up to two month's rent, as security, from
an individual convicted of a felony offense as an incentive to rent the property to
the individual.
b. A lessor may demand an amount or value up to two months rent, as security,
from an individual who has had a judgment entered against that individual for
violating the terms of a previous rental agreement.
2. A lessor may charge a lessee a pet security deposit for keeping an animal that is not a
service animal or companionassistance animal required by a tenant with a disability as
Page No. 1 25.0816.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a reasonable accommodation under fair housing laws. A pet security deposit may not
exceed the greater of two thousand five hundred dollars or an amount equivalent to
two months' rent.
3. A lessor may apply security deposit money and accrued interest upon termination of a
lease towards:
a. Any damages the lessor has suffered by reason of deteriorations or injuries to the
real property or dwelling by the lessee's pet or through the negligence of the
lessee or the lessee's guest.
b. Any unpaid rent.
c. The costs of cleaning or other repairs which were the responsibility of the lessee,
and which are necessary to return the dwelling unit to its original state when the
lessee took possession, reasonable wear and tear excepted.
4. Application of any portion of a security deposit not paid to the lessee upon termination
of the lease under subsection 3 must be itemized by the lessor. SuchThe
itemizationitemized list together with the amount due must be delivered or mailed to
the lessee at the last address furnished to the lessor, along with a written notice within
thirty days after termination of the lease and delivery of possession by the lesseeof the
move - out inspection as provided under section 2 of this Ac t. The itemized list sent to
the lessee under this subsection must include the reasonable estimate provided to the
tenant at the end of the move - out inspection under section 2 of this Act and the fina l
amount deducted from the security deposit, plus any additional costs not covered by
the deposit. The notice must contain a statement of any amount still due to the lessor
or the refund due to the lessee. A lessor is not required to pay interest on security
deposits if the period of occupancy was less than nine months in duration. Any
amounts not claimed from the lessor by the lessee within one year of the termination
of the lease agreement are subject to the reporting requirements of section
47-30.2-04.
4.5. A lessor is liable for treble damages for any security deposit money withheld without
reasonable justification.
5.6. Upon a transfer in ownership of the leased real property or dwelling, the security
deposit and accrued interest shall be transferred to the grantee of the lessor's interest.
Page No. 2 25.0816.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
The grantor shall not be relieved of liability under this section until transfer of the
security deposit to the grantee. The holder of the lessor's interest in the real property
or dwelling at the termination of a lease shall be bound by this section even though
suchthe holder was not the original lessor who received the security deposit.
6.7. This section applies to the state and to political subdivisions of the state that lease real
property or dwellings and require money as a security deposit.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 47-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Mandatory inspections.
1. Before, at the time of, or shortly after a tenant accepts possession of a leased
premises, the landlord and the tenant shall inspect the premises and note on a written
statement all damages to the premises and a remediation plan to repair any damages,
with normal wear and tear excepted. At the conclusion of the inspection, the landlord
and tenant shall sign and date the statement acknowledging the inspection under this
section has occurred. The landlord shall deliver the statement to the tenant within a
reasonable time following the inspection.
2. The landlord and tenant shall conduct a move - out inspection after providing a notice to
vacate but before the expiration date or earlier termination of the lease. Except as
provided in section 47 - 16 - 07.3, the landlord may not re - enter the premises until an
inspection is conducted. The landlord and tenant shall schedule the inspection at a
mutually agreeable time. At the conclusion of the inspection, the landlord and tenant
shall sign and date the statement acknowledging the inspection under this section has
occurred. The statement must include a reasonable estimate, as agreed upon by the
landlord and the tenant, of any costs to be withheld from the security deposit as
provided in section 47 - 16 - 07.1, plus any additional costs not covered by the deposit .
The landlord shall provide a copy of the statement at the conclusion of the inspection.
3. If the tenant fails to appear at the scheduled inspection without communicating to the
landlord a reason for the absence, the landlord shall conduct the inspection and note
any damages to the premises on a written statement. The landlord shall deliver the
statement to the tenant by mail or electronic mail. The tenant's absence is deemed
Page No. 3 25.0816.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
acceptance of the statement created by the landlord. The tenant may designate an
agent to act on behalf of the tenant for the inspections under this section.
4. If the landlord fails to schedule an inspection, or refuses to communicate with the
tenant, or if the landlord fails to appear at the scheduled inspection, the landlord's
absence or failure is deemed acceptance of the condition of the premises and full
responsibility for all damages and the security deposit and accrued interest must be
returned in full to the tenant.
Page No. 4 25.0816.02000